Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 20.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1020
Recreation facility, defined.

Recreation
facility means any real estate project with a primary purpose of promoting
and hosting sports or recreation activities, including sports facilities,
golf courses, beaches, parks, water parks, amusement parks, and related support
amenities.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 20.